Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Chapter 34

Revenue Bond Law

7-34-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Revenue Bond Law.”

Acts 1935 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 33, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 4406.42 (Williams, § 4406.34); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1301.

Cross-References. Bonds for municipal gas acquisition corporations, §7-39-304.

Limitation of actions on bonds, §28-3-113.

Power districts, title 7, ch. 83.

Utility districts, title 7, ch. 82.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 19 Tenn. Juris., Municipal, State and County Securities, § 10.

Law Reviews.

Local Government Law — 1962 Tennessee Survey (Gilbert Merritt, Jr.), 16 Vand. L. Rev. 800 (1963).

Attorney General Opinions. Municipal electric systems as borrowers and re-lenders to third parties, OAG 93-05, 1993 Tenn. AG LEXIS 5 (1/14/93).

Sewer system installation subsidies, OAG 94-105, 1994 Tenn. AG LEXIS 104 (9/9/94).

7-34-102. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Governing body” means bodies and boards, by whatsoever names they may be known, charged with the governing of a municipality;

“Municipality” means any county or incorporated city or town of the state; and

“Public works” means any one (1) or combination of two (2) or more of the following: water, sewerage, gas or electric heat, light or power works, plants and systems or parking facilities, together with all parts thereof and appurtenances thereto, including, but not limited to, supply and distribution systems, electrical power purchased from the Tennessee Valley authority or similar governmental agencies, on a current or long-term purchase basis, reservoirs, dams, sewage treatment and disposal works and generating plants.

Acts 1935 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 33, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 4406.43 (Williams, § 4406.35); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1302; Acts 1981, ch. 260, § 1; 1996, ch. 614, § 1; 2003, ch. 20, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 20, § 3 provided that the powers and authority conferred by the act shall be in addition and supplemental to, and the limitation imposed by the act shall not affect the powers conferred by any other general, special or local law or by any private act.

7-34-103. Declaration of policy.

It is declared to be the policy of this state that any municipality acquiring, purchasing, constructing, reconstructing, improving, bettering or extending any public works pursuant to this chapter shall manage such public works in the most efficient manner consistent with sound economy and public advantage, to the end that the services of the public works shall be furnished to consumers at the lowest possible cost.

No municipality shall operate public works for gain or profit or primarily as a source of revenue to the municipality, but shall operate public works for the use and benefit of the consumers served by the public works and for the promotion of the welfare and for the improvement of the health and safety of the inhabitants of the municipality.

No use of revenues authorized by this chapter shall be construed as being contrary to the policy declared in this section.

Acts 1935 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 33, § 3; C. Supp. 1950, § 4406.44 (Williams, § 4406.36); Acts 1969, ch. 335, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1303.

Law Reviews.

Local Government Law — 1956 Tennessee Survey (Joseph Martin, Jr.), 9 Vand. L. Rev. 1032 (1956).

7-34-104. Powers of municipalities.

In addition to powers that it may now have, any municipality has the power under this chapter to:

Construct, acquire by gift, purchase, or exercise the right of eminent domain, reconstruct, improve, better or extend any public works, within or without the municipality, or partially within or partially without the municipality, and acquire by gift, purchase, or exercise the right of eminent domain, lands, rights in land or water rights in connection with lands, rights in land or water rights;

Operate and maintain any public works for its own use or for the use and benefit of its inhabitants, and also operate and maintain such public works for the use and benefit of persons, firms, and corporations, including municipal corporations and inhabitants of municipal corporations whose residences or places of business are located outside the territorial boundaries of the municipality;

Lease any public works to, or operate and maintain any public works, either wholly or partially, for the use and benefit of the United States or the state of Tennessee or any agency, instrumentality or authority of either the United States or the state of Tennessee, all under such terms and conditions as may be mutually agreed upon, including the transfer of title to such public works after all bonds issued to finance the acquisition or construction of such public works and the interest on all bonds have been paid or provision made for the payment of the bonds; provided, that any public works may, in the discretion of the governing body, be so leased or operated and maintained as a unit separate and distinct from any other public works of the municipality, and the governing body may pledge the revenues and rentals of the public works exclusively for the payment of the principal and interest of any bonds issued to finance the acquisition or construction of such public works, but nothing contained in this subdivision (a)(3) shall prohibit the governing body from pledging the revenues of other public works for the payment of the principal and interest of such bonds and it is hereby given full authority to do so;

Issue its bonds to finance in whole or in part the cost of the acquisition, purchase, construction, reconstruction, improvement, betterment or extension of any public works. The governing body of the municipality in determining the cost may include all cost and estimated cost of the issuance of the bonds, all engineering, inspection, fiscal and legal expenses, and interest that it is estimated will accrue during the construction period and six (6) months thereafter on money borrowed or that it is estimated will be borrowed pursuant to this chapter;

Prescribe and collect rates, fees, and charges for the services, facilities and commodities furnished by such public works;

Pledge to the punctual payment of the bonds and interest on the bonds an amount of the revenues of such public works, including improvements, betterments, or extensions to the public works thereafter constructed or acquired, or of any part of such public works, sufficient to pay the bonds and interest as the bonds and interest shall become due and create and maintain reasonable reserves for the payment of the bonds and interest. The amount may consist of all or any part or portion of such revenue;

Contract with any person, municipality, the United States, the president of the United States, the Tennessee Valley authority, and any and all other authorities, agencies, and instrumentalities of the United States, and, in connection with any such contract, stipulate and agree to such covenants, terms and conditions as the governing body may deem appropriate, including, but not limited to, covenants, terms and conditions with respect to the resale rates, financial and accounting methods, services, operation and maintenance practices, and the manner of disposition of the revenues of the public works, operated and maintained by the municipality;

Use any right-of-way, easement or other similar property right necessary or convenient in connection with the acquisition, improvement, operation or maintenance of a public works, held by the state or any other political subdivision of the state; provided, that the governing body of such other political subdivision shall consent to such use; and

Issue bonds pursuant to this chapter to finance, in whole or in part, the cost of the acquisition of electrical power purchased from the Tennessee Valley authority or similar government agencies on a current or long-term prepaid purchase basis and pledge to the punctual payment of any such bonds and interest on the bonds its rights in such contracts and an amount of the revenues of its public works, including improvements, betterments, or extensions to such public works thereafter constructed or acquired, or of any part of such public works, sufficient to pay the bonds and interest as the bonds and interest become due and create and maintain reasonable reserves for the payment of the bonds and interest. The amount shall consist of all or any part or portion of such revenue. The governing body of the municipality, in determining the cost of the acquisition of electrical power under this subsection (a), may include all costs and estimated costs of the issuance of the bonds, all engineering, inspection, fiscal and legal expenses.

Any municipality authorized by chapter 52, part 4 of this title, to provide any of the services described in chapter 52, part 4 shall have the power and is hereby authorized to borrow money, contract debts and issue its bonds or notes pursuant to the terms of this subsection (b) to finance in whole or in part the cost of the acquisition, purchase, construction, reconstruction, improvement, betterment or extension of a system or systems, or any part thereof, to provide any of such services, including the acquisition of land or rights in land and the acquisition and installation of all equipment necessarily incident to the provision of such services; provided, that:

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, such services shall not constitute “public works” as defined in § 7-34-102;

For regulatory purposes, a municipality issuing bonds or notes for the purposes set forth in this subsection (b) shall allocate to the costs of providing any of the services authorized by § 7-52-401 payments of principal of, interest on and amortized costs incurred in connection with the issuance of such bonds or notes; provided, that if any of such bonds or notes are issued in such a way that interest on the bonds is excludable from gross income for federal income tax purposes, the municipality shall allocate to costs, in lieu of the actual interest being paid on such bonds or notes, an amount equal to interest that would be payable on the bonds or notes if the bonds or notes were bearing interest at rates equal to the average of the most recently published Moody's Long-Term Corporate Bond Yield Averages and Intermediate Corporate Bond Yield Averages for AAA Public Utilities;

Nothing in this subsection (b) shall be read to diminish or alter the jurisdiction of the Tennessee public utility commission over municipalities that provide any of the services described in chapter 52, part 4 of this title;

To the extent that they do not conflict with subdivisions (b)(1)-(3), the provisions of this chapter relating to the authorization, issuance and sale of bonds or notes, the use and application of revenues of the system or systems being financed, powers to secure such bonds and notes, covenants and remedies for the benefit of bond or note holders with respect to such bonds or notes, validity with respect to such bonds or notes, and powers to refund and refinance such bonds or notes shall apply to any bonds or notes issued for the purposes described in this subsection (b) and the system or systems financed by the issuance and sale of bonds or notes; and

Section 7-52-402 shall apply to the use and application of revenues authorized and permitted by this section.

Acts 1935 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 33, § 4; 1937, ch. 230, § 2; 1949, ch. 211, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 4406.45 (Williams, § 4406.37); modified; Acts 1955, ch. 216, § 1; modified; 1975, ch. 5, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1304; Acts 1987, ch. 158, § 3; 1998, ch. 1004, § 1; 2003, ch. 20, § 2; 2017, ch. 94, § 9.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 20, § 3 provided that the powers and authority conferred by the act shall be in addition and supplemental to, and the limitation imposed by the act shall not affect the powers conferred by any other general, special or local law or by any private act.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “Tennessee public utility commission” for “Tennessee regulatory authority” in (b)(3).

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

Cross-References. Cities and towns, mutual assistance in firefighting, title 6, ch. 54, part 6.

Extension of service beyond city limits, §7-51-401.

Utility districts, title 7, ch. 82.

Attorney General Opinions. Home rule municipality's authority regarding the control of storm water, OAG 92-71, 1992 Tenn. AG LEXIS 69 (12/28/92).

Multi-county gas utility districts, OAG 93-56 (9/2/93).

Domestic nonprofit water cooperative merging with or transferring assets to municipality, OAG 06-176, 2006 Tenn. AG LEXIS 196 (12/19/06).

7-34-105. Works within other municipalities.

No municipality shall construct public works wholly or partly within the corporate limits of another municipality, other than to perform maintenance on or make improvements to its existing public works system in its service area, except with the consent of the governing body of the other municipality.

Acts 1935 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 33, § 13; C. Supp. 1950, § 4406.54 (Williams, § 4406.46); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1305; Acts 2009, ch. 74, § 1.

Attorney General Opinions. A municipality is authorized to take and condemn lands to lay a sewer line through another municipality; however, if the utility is financed under the Revenue Bond Law or the Local Government Public Obligations Act of 1986, the municipality building the utility through the territory of another municipality must obtain the consent of the latter's governing body, OAG 01-098, 2001 Tenn. AG LEXIS 89 (6/13/01).

7-34-106. Exemption from utilities regulation.

It is unnecessary for a municipality proceeding under this chapter to obtain a certificate of convenience or necessity, franchise, license, permit, or other authorization from a bureau, board, commission, or other like instrumentality of the state to acquire, construct, purchase, reconstruct, improve, extend, maintain, or operate public works, except as provided in §68-221-1017.

Acts 1935 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 33, § 16; C. Supp. 1950, § 4406.57 (Williams, § 4406.49); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1306; Acts 2020, ch. 720, § 1.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment rewrote this section, which read: “It shall not be necessary for any municipality proceeding under this chapter to obtain any certificate of convenience or necessity, franchise, license, permit, or other authorization from any bureau, board, commission or other like instrumentality of the state in order to acquire, construct, purchase, reconstruct, improve, better, extend, maintain and operate any public works.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 720, § 6. June 22, 2020.

Cross-References. Municipal gas companies exempt, §7-39-311.

Municipal utilities exemption not eliminated, §7-34-117.

Collateral References.

Public utility acts, applicability of, to municipal corporations owning or operating a public utility. 10 A.L.R. 1432, 18 A.L.R. 946.

7-34-107. Deposit of revenues.

All moneys of a municipality derived from a public works shall be deposited in one (1) or more banks or trust companies in a special account or accounts.

Acts 1935 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 33, § 14; 1937, ch. 230, § 3; C. Supp. 1950, § 4406.55 (Williams, § 4406.47); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1307.

7-34-108. Charges to municipality or department.

Charges shall be made for any service rendered by a public works to a municipality or to any department or works of the municipality, at the rate applicable to other customers taking service under similar conditions. Revenues derived from such service shall be treated as all other revenues.

Acts 1935 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 33, § 15; C. Supp. 1950, § 4406.56 (Williams, § 4406.48); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1308.

Collateral References.

Advertising or promotional expenditures of public utility as part of operating expenses for ratemaking purposes. 83 A.L.R.3d 963.

Power of municipality to charge nonresidents higher fees than resident for use of municipal facilities. 57 A.L.R.3d 998.

7-34-109. Authorized projects — Bond issues — Resolutions — Interim certificates.

The construction, acquisition, reconstruction, improvement, betterments or extension of any public works may be authorized under this chapter, and bonds may be authorized to be issued under this chapter to provide funds for such purpose or purposes by resolution or resolutions of the governing body, which may be adopted at the same meeting at which they are introduced by a majority of all members of the governing body then in office, and shall take effect immediately upon adoption.

The bonds shall bear interest at a zero (0) rate or at rates that vary from time to time or at such rate or rates; payable at such time or times; may be in one (1) or more series; may bear such date or dates; may mature at such time or times, not exceeding forty (40) years from their respective dates; may be payable in such medium of payment, at such place or places; may carry such registration privileges; may be subject to such terms of redemption; may be executed in such manner; may contain such terms, covenants and conditions; and may be in such form, as such resolution or subsequent resolutions may provide.

The bonds may be sold at public or private sale at such price as may be determined by the governing body.

Pending the preparation of the definitive bonds, interim receipts or certificates in such form and with such provisions as the governing body may determine may be issued to the purchaser or purchasers of bonds sold pursuant to this chapter.

The bonds and interim receipts or certificates shall be fully negotiable within the meaning of and for all purposes of the Uniform Commercial Code, compiled in title 47, chapters 1-9.

With respect to all or any portion of any issue of bonds or notes issued or anticipated to be issued under this chapter, at any time during the term of the bonds or notes, and upon receipt of a report of the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee finding that the contracts and agreements authorized in this subsection (f) are in compliance with the guidelines, rules or regulations adopted or promulgated by the state funding board, as set forth in subsection (h), a municipality by resolution may authorize and enter into interest rate swap or exchange agreements, agreements establishing interest rate floors or ceilings or both, and other interest rate hedging agreements under such terms and conditions as the governing body of the municipality may determine, including, but not limited to, provisions permitting the municipality to pay to or receive from any person or entity any loss of benefits under such agreement upon early termination of the agreement or default under such agreement.

The governing body of a municipality may enter into an agreement to sell its bonds and notes, other than its refunding bonds, under this chapter, providing for delivery of its bonds and notes on a date greater than ninety (90) days and not greater than five (5) years, or such greater period of time if approved by the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee, from the date of execution of such agreement or to sell its refunding bonds under this chapter, providing for delivery of its refunding bonds on a date greater than ninety (90) days from the date of execution of the agreement and not greater than the first optional redemption date on which the bonds being refunded can be optionally redeemed resulting in cost savings or at par, whichever is earlier, only upon receipt of a report of the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee finding that the agreement or contract of a municipality to sell its bonds and notes as authorized in this subsection (g) is in compliance with the guidelines, rules or regulations adopted or promulgated by the state funding board in accordance with subsection (h). Agreements to sell bonds and refunding bonds for delivery ninety (90) days or less from the date of execution of the agreement do not require a report of the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee.

The state funding board shall establish guidelines, rules or regulations with respect to the agreements and contracts referenced in subsections (f) and (g), which may include, but shall not be limited to, the following:

The conditions under which such agreements or contracts can be entered into;

The methods by which such contracts are to be solicited and procured;

The form and content such contracts shall take;

The aspects of risk exposure associated with such contracts;

The standards and procedures for counterparty selection, including rating criteria;

The procurement of credit enhancement, liquidity facilities, or the setting aside of reserves in connection with such contracts or agreements;

The methods of securing the financial interest in such contracts;

The methods to be used to reflect such contracts in the municipality's financial statements;

Financial monitoring and periodic assessment of such contracts by the municipality;

The application and source of nonperiodic payments; and

Educational requirements for officials of any municipality responsible for approving any such contract or agreement.

Prior to the adoption by the governing body of the municipality of a resolution authorizing such contract or agreement, a request shall be submitted to the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee for a report finding that such contract or agreement is in compliance with the guidelines, rules or regulations of the state funding board. Within fifteen (15) days of receipt of the request, the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee shall determine whether the contract or agreement substantially complies with the guidelines, rules or regulations and shall report on such compliance to the municipality. If the report of the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee finds that the contract or agreement complies with the guidelines, rules or regulations of the state funding board or the comptroller of the treasury shall fail to report within the fifteen-day period, then the municipality may take such action with respect to the proposed contract or agreement as it deems advisable in accordance with this section and the guidelines, rules or regulations of the state funding board. If the report of the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee finds that such contract or agreement is not in compliance with the guidelines, rules or regulations, then the municipality is not authorized to enter into such contract or agreement. The guidelines, rules or regulations shall provide for an appeal process to a determination of noncompliance.

When entering into any contracts or agreements facilitating the issuance and sale of bonds and notes, including contracts or agreements providing for liquidity and credit enhancement and reimbursement agreements relating to the contracts or agreements, interest rate swap or exchange agreements, agreements establishing interest rate floors or ceilings or both, other interest rate hedging agreements, and agreements with the purchaser of the bonds authorized under this section or with the purchaser of the notes authorized under § 7-34-111 evidencing a transaction bearing a reasonable relationship to this state and also to another state or nation, the municipality may agree in the written contract or agreement that the rights and remedies of the parties to the contract or agreement shall be governed by the laws of this state or the laws of such other state or nation; provided, that jurisdiction over any municipality against which an action on such a contract or agreement is brought shall lie solely in a court in Tennessee that would otherwise have jurisdiction of actions brought in contract against such municipality.

Prior to the adoption or promulgation by the state funding board of guidelines, rules or regulations with respect to the contracts and agreements authorized in subsections (f) and (g), a municipality may enter into such contracts or agreements to the extent otherwise authorized in this chapter or in any other law notwithstanding subsections (f) and (g). Nothing in subsection (f), (g), (h) or (i) is intended to alter any existing authority in this chapter or in any other law otherwise providing authority for a municipality to enter into the contracts or agreements described in subsection (f), (g), (h) or (i) heretofore entered into or entered into prior to the adoption or promulgation by the state funding board of guidelines, rules or regulations.

When entering into an interest rate agreement authorized by this section, a municipality may secure its obligations under the agreement, including its obligation for termination or other nonperiodic payments, with the revenues available to secure the bonds with respect to which such interest rate agreement is entered into.

Acts 1935 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 33, § 5; C. Supp. 1950, § 4406.46 (Williams, § 4406.38); Acts 1955, ch. 216, § 2; 1969, ch. 192, § 1; 1969, ch. 284, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1309; Acts 1985, ch. 225, § 3; 1999, ch. 427, § 1; 2001, ch. 253, §§ 3-7; 2004, ch. 589, § 3.

Cross-References. Bonds exempt from taxation, §7-34-116.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 19 Tenn. Juris., Municipal, State and County Securities, § 10.

7-34-110. Covenants in resolutions — Bondholders' remedies.

Any resolution authorizing the issuance of bonds under this chapter may contain covenants as to:

The purpose or purposes to which the proceeds of sale of bonds may be applied and the use and disposition of the proceeds;

The use and disposition of the revenue of the public works for which the bonds are to be issued, including the creation and maintenance of reserves;

The transfer from the general funds of the municipality to the account or accounts of the public works an amount equal to the cost of furnishing such municipality or any of its departments, boards or agencies with the services, facilities and commodities of the public works;

The issuance of other or additional bonds payable from the revenue of the public works;

The operation and maintenance of such public works;

The insurance to be carried on the bonds and the use and disposition of insurance moneys;

Books of accounts and the inspection and audit of the books and as to accounting methods; and

The terms and conditions upon which the holders of the bonds or any proportion of them or any trustees for the holders shall be entitled to the appointment of a receiver by the chancery court, which court shall have jurisdiction in such proceedings, and which receiver may enter and take possession of the public works, operate and maintain the public works, prescribe rates, fees or charges, and collect, receive and apply all revenue thereafter arising from the public works in the same manner as the municipality itself might do.

This chapter and any such resolution or resolutions shall be a contract with the holder or holders of the bonds, and the duties of the municipality and of its governing body and officers under this chapter and any such resolution or resolutions shall be enforceable by any bondholder by mandamus or other appropriate suit, action or proceeding in any court of competent jurisdiction.

Acts 1935 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 33, § 6; C. Supp. 1950, § 4406.47 (Williams, § 4406.39); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1310.

7-34-111. Revenue anticipation notes — Bonds and notes not general obligations.

The governing body, or any board or commission of a municipality having jurisdiction, control and management of the public works of a municipality, may borrow money in anticipation of the collection of revenues from such public works and issue negotiable notes to evidence such borrowing, the proceeds from the sale of such notes to be used for the purpose of paying the cost of construction of additions, betterments and improvements to and extensions of the public works, the revenues of which are pledged to the payment of such notes.

Such notes shall be payable not later than five (5) years from the date of the notes, and shall be sold in such manner and upon such terms and conditions as may be determined by the governing body, board or commission issuing the notes.

The governing body may issue bonds in the manner provided by § 7-34-109, for the funding of notes issued pursuant to subsection (a), and for the purpose of refunding at or prior to maturity bonds theretofore issued pursuant to § 7-34-109.

The governing body, or any board or commission of a municipality having jurisdiction, control and management of an electric power distribution system or a natural gas distribution system, may borrow money in anticipation of the collection of revenues from such system and issue negotiable notes to evidence such borrowing for the purpose of financing electrical power or gas purchases, including storage costs and pipeline capacity costs. Any such notes shall be secured solely by a pledge of and lien on the revenues of such system. The principal amount of notes that may be issued during any twelve-month period shall not exceed sixty percent (60%) of total electrical power or gas purchases for the same period, and all notes issued during such period shall be retired and paid in full on or before the end of such period. The notes shall be sold in such manner, at such price and upon such terms and conditions as may be determined by the governing body, board or commission issuing such notes. No notes shall be issued under this subsection (d) unless the electric system or gas system for which the notes are to be issued has positive retained earnings as shown in the most recent audited financial statements of the system, and the system has produced positive net income in at least one (1) fiscal year out of the three (3) fiscal years next preceding the issuance of the notes as shown on the audited financial statements of the system. No notes shall be issued without first being approved by the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee. If the revenues of such system are insufficient to pay all such notes at maturity, any unpaid notes may be renewed one (1) time for a period not to exceed one (1) year or may be retired with funding bonds issued pursuant to the Cash Basis Law of 1937, compiled in title 9, chapter 11, or may be otherwise liquidated as approved by the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee.

This chapter for the payment and security of bonds issued pursuant to this chapter shall be equally applicable to notes issued pursuant to this section.

No holder or holders of any bonds or notes issued under this chapter shall have the right to compel any exercise of the taxing powers of the municipality to pay the bonds or notes, or the interest on the bonds or notes, and each bond or note issued under this chapter shall recite in substance that the bond or note, as the case may be, including the interest on the bond or note, is payable solely from the revenues pledged to the payment of the bond or note, and that the bond or note does not constitute a debt of the municipality within the meaning of any statutory limitation.

Acts 1935 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 33, § 9; C. Supp. 1950, § 4406.50 (Williams, § 4406.42); Acts 1957, ch. 196, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1311; Acts 1996, ch. 794, §§ 1, 2; 2010, ch. 868, § 17.

Collateral References.

Revenue bonds or other bonds not creating indebtedness as within constitutional or statutory requirement of prior approval by electors of issuance of bonds or incurring indebtedness by municipality. 146 A.L.R. 604.

7-34-112. Validity of bonds.

The bonds bearing the signatures of officers in office on the date of the signing of the bonds shall be valid and binding obligations, notwithstanding that before delivery of, and payment for, the bonds any or all the persons whose signatures appear on the bonds have ceased to be officers of the municipality issuing the bonds. The validity of the bonds shall not be dependent on nor affected by the validity or regularity of any proceedings relating to the acquisition, purchase, construction, reconstruction, improvement, betterment, or extension of the public works for which the bonds are issued. The resolution authorizing the bonds may provide that the bonds shall contain a recital that they are issued pursuant to this chapter, which recital shall be conclusive evidence of their validity and of the regularity of their issuance.

Acts 1935 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 33, § 7; C. Supp. 1950, § 4406.48 (Williams, § 4406.40); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1312.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 19 Tenn. Juris., Municipal, State and County Securities, § 10.

7-34-113. Lien on public works revenue.

All bonds of the same issue shall, subject to the prior and superior rights of outstanding bonds, claims or obligations, have a prior and paramount lien on the revenue of the public works for which the bonds have been issued, over and ahead of all bonds of any issue payable from the revenue that may be subsequently issued, and over and ahead of any claims or obligations of any nature against the revenue subsequently arising or subsequently incurred; provided, that the proceedings authorizing any issue of bonds may provide for the issuance of additional bonds on a parity with the bonds.

All bonds of the same issue shall be equally and ratably secured without priority by reason of number, date of bonds, of sale, or execution, or of delivery, by a lien on the revenue in accordance with this chapter and the resolution or resolutions authorizing the bonds.

Acts 1935 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 33, § 8; C. Supp. 1950, § 4406.49 (Williams, § 4406.41); Acts 1967, ch. 256, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1313.

7-34-114. Rates sufficient to support plant — Consumer use of auxiliary energy sources.

The governing body of a municipality issuing bonds pursuant to this chapter shall prescribe and collect reasonable rates, fees or charges for the services, facilities and commodities of such public works, and shall revise such rates, fees or charges, from time to time, whenever necessary so that such public works shall be and always remain self-supporting. The rates, fees or charges prescribed shall be such as will produce revenue at least sufficient to:

Pay when due all bonds and interest on the bonds, for the payment of which such revenue is or shall have been pledged, charged or otherwise encumbered, including reserves for the payment of the bonds and interest; and

Provide for all expenses of operation and maintenance of such public works, including reserves for the expenses and maintenance.

When such public works supplies its services to consumers who use solar or wind powered equipment as a source of energy, such public works shall not discriminate against such consumers by its rates, fees or charges or by altering the availability or quality of energy.

Any consumer who uses solar power, wind power, or other auxiliary source of energy shall install and operate the equipment, property, or appliance for such energy source in compliance with any state or local code or regulation applicable to the safe operation of such equipment, property, or appliance.

Acts 1935 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 33, § 10; C. Supp. 1950, § 4406.51 (Williams, § 4406.43); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1314; Acts 1980, ch. 756, § 1.

Cross-References. Discrimination by public utilities against consumers using auxiliary energy sources, §§ 65-4-105,65-5-104.

Attorney General Opinions. Municipal authority to charge residents never connected to water system, OAG 98-0152, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 152 (8/12/98).

Discount rates for charitable organizations not authorized, OAG 99-026, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 25 (2/16/99).

Collateral References.

Advertising or promotional expenditures of public utility as part of operating expenses for ratemaking purposes. 83 A.L.R.3d 963.

Validity of “fuel adjustment” or similar clauses authorizing electric utility to pass on increased cost of fuel to its customers. 83 A.L.R.3d 933.